test/tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/fstspeller-gt-norm-yamls/spellertests_fstspeller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  CmpNP/Suff tests:
    lohka+N+Sg+Nom                : ~lohka  # +CmpNP/Suff converted to a flag that should block this analysis
    lohkka+N+Sg+Acc               :  lohka
    lohkka+N+Sg+Gen               :  lohka
    lohkka+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Allegro:  lohka

    lohka+N+Sg+Acc                : ~loga   # +CmpNP/Suff converted to the flag sequence @R.CmpOnly.TRUE@" @P.CmpLast.TRUE@
    lohka+N+Sg+Gen                : ~loga   # +CmpNP/Suff converted to the flag sequence @R.CmpOnly.TRUE@" @P.CmpLast.TRUE@
    lohka+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Allegro : ~loga   # +CmpNP/Suff converted to the flag sequence @R.CmpOnly.TRUE@" @P.CmpLast.TRUE@
    lohkat+V+Imprt+ConNeg         :  loga
    lohkat+V+Imprt+Sg2            :  loga
    lohkat+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg       :  loga
    lohkat+V+VGen                 :  loga

    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#lohka+N+Sg+Nom                : viessolohka # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#lohkka+N+Sg+Acc               : viessolohka
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#lohkka+N+Sg+Gen               : viessolohka
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#lohkka+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Allegro: viessolohka

    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#lohka+N+Sg+Acc                : viessologa  # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#lohka+N+Sg+Gen                : viessologa  # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#lohka+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Allegro : viessologa  # +CmpNP/Suff
    
    lohka+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+N+Sg+Nom: ~lohkaviessu # +CmpNP/Last
    loga+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+N+Sg+Nom: ~lohkaviessu # +CmpNP/Last
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#lohka+N+Sg+Nom+Cmp#gáica+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom: ~viessolohkagáica # +CmpNP/Last




  CmpNP/Last tests:
    lávda+N+Sg+Nom: lávda       # +CmpNP/Last - denne skal vera ok
    guolgaduhkku+N+Sg+Nom: guolgaduhkku       # +CmpNP/Last - denne skal vera ok
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgGenCmp+Use/NG+Use/Circ+Cmp#lávda+N+Sg+Nom: viesulávda # +CmpNP/Last
    stohpu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgGenCmp+Use/NG+Use/Circ+Cmp#guolgaduhkku+N+Sg+Nom: stobuguolgaduhkku # +CmpNP/Last
    lávda+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+N+Sg+Nom: ~lávdaviessu # +CmpNP/Last
    guolgaduhkku+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#stohpu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+N+Sg+Nom: ~guolgaduhkustohpu # +CmpNP/Last
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#lávda+N+Sg+Nom+Cmp#gáica+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom: ~viessolávdagáica # +CmpNP/Last
    stohpu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#guolgaduhkku+N+Sg+Nom+Cmp#vearrát+N+Sg+Nom: ~stohpoguolgaduhkkovearrát # +CmpNP/Last


  CmpNP/First tests:
    EU-direktiiva+N+Sg+Nom: EU-direktiiva       # +CmpNP/First - denne skal vera ok
    mástorándi+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#EU-direktiiva+N+Sg+Nom: ~mástorándeEU-direktiiva # +CmpNP/First
    mástorándi+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp-#EU-direktiiva+N+Sg+Nom: ~mástoránde-EU-direktiiva # +CmpNP/First
    EU-direktiiva+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#mástorándi+N+Sg+Nom: EU-direktiivamástorándi # +CmpNP/First
    mástorándi+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#EU-direktiiva+N+Sg+Nom#gáica+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom: ~mástorándeEU-direktiivagáica # +CmpNP/First
    mástorándi+N+SgNomCmp+RCmpnd#EU-direktiiva+N+Sg+Nom#gáica+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom: ~mástoránde-EU-direktiivagáica # +CmpNP/First
    
    várá+N+Sg+Nom: várá       # +CmpNP/First - denne skal vera ok
    várá+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#biigá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: várábiigán # +CmpNP/First
    biigá+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#várá+N+Sg+Nom: ~biigávárá # +CmpNP/First

    
  CmpNP/None tests:
    ráddi+N+Sg+Nom: ráddi       # +CmpNP/None - denne skal vera ok
    ráddi+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#seaidni+N+Sg+Ill: ~ráddeseaidnái       # +CmpNP/None
    seaidni+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#ráddi+N+Sg+Ill: ~seaidneráddái       # +CmpNP/None
    seaidni+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#ráddi+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#gorut+N+Sg+Nom: ~seaidneráddegorut # +CmpNP/None

    ovccičuođis+N+Sg+Nom: ovccičuođis       # +CmpNP/None - denne skal vera ok
    ovccičuođis+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#osttus+N+Pl+Nom: ~ovccičuođesostosat       # +CmpNP/None
    osttus+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#ovccičuođis+N+Sg+Ill: ~osttusovccičuođis       # +CmpNP/None
    osttus+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#ovccičuođes+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#osolaš+N+Sg+Nom: ~osttusovccičuođesosolaš # +CmpNP/None



  CmpNP/Pref tests:
    cirggangeaš+N: ~cirggangeaš  # +CmpNP/Pref converted to a flag that should block this analysis
    cirggangeaš+N+Cmp#seaidni+N+Sg+Ill: cirggangeašseaidnái # +CmpNP/Pref
    cirggangeaš+N+Hyph+Cmp#seaidni+N+Sg+Ill: cirggangeaš-seaidnái # +CmpNP/Pref
    seaidni+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#cirggangeaš+N: ~seaidnecirggangeaš # +CmpNP/Pref

    portugála+N: ~portugála  # +CmpNP/Pref converted to a flag that should block this analysis
    portugála+N+Cmp#metálla+N+Sg+Acc: portugálametálla # +CmpNP/Pref
    portugála+N+Hyph+Cmp#metálla+N+Sg+Acc: portugála-metálla # +CmpNP/Pref
    metálla+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#portugála+N: ~metállaportugála # +CmpNP/Pref

    
#  CmpN/SgG tests:
#    vuohppaáddjá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Gen: vuohppaádjá       # +CmpN/SgG - denne skal vera ok
#    vuohppaáddjá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+SgGenCmp+Use/NG+Use/Circ+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Nom: vuohppaádjájuolgi      # +CmpN/SgG 
#    juolgi+N+SgGenCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#vuohppaádjá+N+Sg+Gen: ~juolggevuohppaádjá      # +CmpN/SgG 
#    
#    antisápmi+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+N+SgGenCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#lávvu+N+Sg+Nom: antisámelávvu      # +CmpN/SgG 
#    antisápmi+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+N+Sg+Nom#lávvu+N+Sg+Nom: ~antisápmelávvu      # +CmpN/SgG 
#    moraš+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#antisápmi+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+N+SgGenCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#lávvu+N+Sg+Nom: morašantisámelávvu      # +CmpN/SgG
#    moraš+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#antisápmi+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#lávvu+N+Sg+Nom: ~morašantisápmelávvu      # +CmpN/SgG 
#    moraš+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#antisápmi+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro: morašantisáme       # +CmpN/SgG
#    
#  CmpN/SgN tests:
#    bibbadirri+N+Sg+Nom: bibbadirri        # +CmpN/SgN - denne skal vera ok
#    bibbadirri+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#guollár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom: bibbadirriguollár      # +CmpN/SgN 
#    bibbadirri+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#somá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+A+Sg+Acc: bibbadirrisomá      # +CmpN/SgN
#    bibbadirri+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#garas+A+Sg+Nom: bibbadirrigaras      # +CmpN/SgN
#    somá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+A+SgGenCmp+Use/NG+Use/Circ+Cmp#bibbadirri+N+Sg+Nom: somábibbadirri      # +CmpN/SgN
#    bibbadirri+N+Use/NG+Use/Circ+Cmp#gávpot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom: ~bibbadirigávpot      # +CmpN/SgN
#    bibbadirri+N+Use/Circ+Cmp#šleđggon+N+Sg+Nom: ~bibbadiriidšleđggon      # +CmpN/SgN
#    
#  CmpN/PlN tests:
#    geargil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+A+PlGenCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#buktit+V+Use/-PLX+PrsPrc+Use/-PLX: geargiliidbukti      # +CmpN/PlG
#    geargil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+A+Use/Circ+Cmp#buktit+V+Use/-PLX+PrsPrc+Use/-PLX: ~geargiliidbukti      # +CmpN/PlG
#    buktit+V+Der2+Der/NomAg+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+PlGenCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#ráfi+N+Sg+Nom: buktiidráfi      # +CmpN/PlG
#
#  CmpN/SgGenLeft tests:
#    niibi+N+SgGenCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#govdosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+A+Pl+Nom: niibbegovdosaččat      # +CmpN/SgGenLeft
#    niibi+N+SgGenCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#ruovdi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom: ~niibberuovddit      # +CmpN/SgGenLeft
#    niibi+N+SgGenCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#njaman+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Sg+Nom: niibbenjaman      # +CmpN/SgGenLeft
#
#
#  CmpN/PlGenLeft tests:
#    čálgobuorri+N+PlGenCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#hálddahangeavat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Sg+Nom: čálgoburiidhálddahangeavat      # +CmpN/PlGenLeft
#    čálasátni+N+PlGenCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#gearggaheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+A+Pl+Nom: čálasániidgearggaheapme     # +CmpN/PlGenLeft
#    čálasátni+N+PlGenCmp+Use/Circ+Cmp#dovddiidusduogáš+N+Sg+Nom: ~čálasániiddovddiidusduogáš      # +CmpN/PlGenLeft
